California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided by law and subject to the limitations of subdivision (b), upon its own motion or the motion of any party, the court may conduct a trial or evidentiary hearing, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology, absent a showing by the opposing party as to why a remote appearance or testimony should not be allowed.

(2) (A) Except as provided in Section 269 of the Code of Civil Procedure and Section 69957 of the Government Code, if the court conducts a trial, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology, the official reporter or official reporter pro tempore shall be physically
 present in the courtroom.

(B) If the court conducts a trial, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology, upon request, the court interpreter shall be physically present in the courtroom.

(e) (1) Before the court with jurisdiction over the case may proceed with a remote conference, hearing, proceeding, or trial, the court shall have a process for a party, witness, official reporter, official reporter pro tempore, court interpreter, or other court personnel to alert the judicial officer of technology or audibility issues that arise during the conference, hearing, proceeding, or trial.

(2) The court shall require that a remote appearance by a party or witness have the necessary privacy and security appropriate for the conference, hearing, proceeding, or trial.

(3) The court shall inform all parties, particularly parties without legal representation, about the potential technological or audibility issues that could arise when using remote technology, which may require a delay of or halt the conference, hearing, proceeding, or trial. The court shall make information available to self-represented parties regarding the options for appearing in person and through the use of remote technology.

(f) The court shall not require a party to appear through the use of remote technology. If the court permits an appearance through remote technology, the court must ensure that technology in the courtroom enables all parties, whether appearing remotely or in person, to fully participate in the conference, hearing, or proceeding.

(g) A self-represented party may appear remotely in a
 conference, hearing, or proceeding conducted through the use of remote technology only if they agree to do so.

(h) Any juvenile dependency proceeding may be conducted in whole or in part through the use of remote technology subject to the following:

(1) Any person authorized to be present may request to appear remotely.

(2) (A) Any party to the proceeding may request that the court compel the physical presence of a witness or party. A witness, including a party providing testimony, may appear through remote technology only with the consent of all parties, except as provided in subparagraph (B), and if the witness has access to the appropriate technology.

(B) A parent, child, nonminor dependent, or Indian tribe as defined in Section
 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, may utilize remote technology for the appearance of an expert witness without the consent of all parties.

(3) A court shall not require a party to appear through the use of remote technology.

(4) The confidentiality requirements that apply to an in-person juvenile dependency proceeding shall apply to a juvenile dependency proceeding conducted through the use of remote technology.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding Section 8613.5 of the Family Code, in an adoption proceeding under Division 13 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Family Code, the court may conduct an adoption finalization hearing, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology, without the court finding that it is impossible or impracticable for either prospective adoptive parent to
 make the appearance in person.

(2) A court shall not require a party to appear through the use of remote technology.

(3) The confidentiality and privacy requirements that apply to an in-person adoption finalization hearing, including, but not limited to, the requirements in Section 8611 of the Family Code, apply to an adoption finalization hearing conducted through the use of remote technology.

(j) For purposes of this section, a party includes a nonparty subject to Chapter 6 of Title 4 of Part 4 (commencing with Section 2020.010).

(k) Subject to the limitations in subdivision (b), this section is not intended to prohibit the use of appearances through the use of remote technology when stipulated by attorneys for represented parties.

(l) Consistent with its constitutional rulemaking authority, the Judicial Council shall adopt rules to implement the policies and provisions in this section to promote statewide consistency, including, but not limited to, the following procedures:

(1) A deadline by which a party must notify the court and the other parties of their request to appear remotely.

(2) Procedures and standards for a judicial officer to determine when a conference, hearing, or proceeding may be conducted through the use of remote technology. The procedures and standards shall require that a judicial officer give consideration to the limited access to technology or transportation that a party or witness might have.

(m) This section shall remain in effect only until January
 1,
 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.   (SB 174)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

367.76.

(a) (1) This section applies to proceedings in the following matters:

(A) Judicial commitments under Part 2 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, except for delinquency proceedings.

(B) Involuntary treatment and conservatorships of gravely disabled persons under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5000), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5150), and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including Murphy conservatorships.

(C) Contempt proceedings under Title 5 (commencing with Section 1209) of Part 3 of
 this code.

(D) Mentally disordered offender proceedings under Article 4 (commencing with Section 2960) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(E) Commitment proceedings under Section 1026, et seq. of the Penal Code.

(F) Competency proceedings under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(G) Placement and revocation proceedings pursuant to Section 1600 et seq. of the Penal Code.

(H) Involuntary medication and treatment hearings for individuals committed or awaiting admission to a State Department of State Hospitals facility as described in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) This section does not apply to proceedings in matters brought pursuant to Sections 601 and 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Person” means the person subject to any proceeding in matters described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) “Proceeding” or “proceedings” includes, but is not limited to, all hearings, conferences, and trials in matters described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(3) “Remote technology” means technology that provides for the two-way transmission of video and audio signals except that audio signals alone may be permitted where specifically authorized by law. Remote technology
 shall include, but not be limited to, a computer, tablet, telephone, cellular telephone, or other electronic or communications device. Notwithstanding the foregoing and subject to subdivision (h), the person subject to the proceeding, in consultation with counsel if represented, may, at their request, participate through audio-only technology.

(c) Proceedings in matters arising under subdivision (a) may be conducted through the use of remote technology subject to the following:

(1) A person has the right to be physically present for all proceedings and shall not be required to appear through the use of remote technology.

(2) A person may waive their right to be physically present and may elect to appear remotely.

(3) Except as provided in subdivisions
 (d), (e), and (h), a party, counsel for a party, or witness may appear through the use of remote technology.

(4) The confidentiality requirements that apply to inperson proceedings shall apply with equal force and effect when conducted through the use of remote technology.

(d) If the person is physically present in court the following shall apply:

(1) Absent exceptional circumstances and except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), counsel for the person, counsel for the other party or parties, the other party or parties, and the judicial officer shall be physically present in the courtroom.

(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code, absent a waiver by the person or a finding
 of good cause by the court, any witness the other party or parties calls shall be physically present in the courtroom. In determining whether good cause exists to excuse the physical presence of a witness, the court shall consider the distance the witness must travel, the nature of the testimony, and the nature of the proceeding.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), counsel and witnesses for the State Department of Developmental Services shall not be required to be physically present in the courtroom absent a finding of good cause by the court.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), counsel and witnesses for the State Department of State Hospitals shall not be required to be physically present in the courtroom in any nonjury trial matters or proceedings described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) absent a finding of good cause by the court.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, unless good cause exists, a court shall not compel the physical presence of the person who is a patient in a State Department of State Hospitals or State Department of Developmental Services facility or other inpatient or outpatient treatment facility absent consent of the person in consultation with counsel. In determining whether good cause exists to compel the physical presence of a patient, the court shall consider the nature of the hearing and whether requiring the physical presence of the patient would interfere with the person’s program of treatment or be detrimental to their mental or physical health.

(f) (1) Until July 1, 2024, when the court conducts proceedings that will be reported by an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore, the reporter shall be physically present in the same room as the judicial
 officer except where the court finds that, as the result of unusual circumstances, this requirement would place extreme or undue hardship on the court or the litigants. For purposes of this paragraph, “unusual circumstances” means a work stoppage, a circumstance described in subdivision (a) of Section 68115 of the Government Code, an unforeseen emergency, court proceedings conducted in a remote court location to which a judicial officer is not regularly assigned to sit, or when a judicial officer has to travel to a location outside of a courthouse to conduct the proceeding.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2024, when the court conducts proceedings that will be reported by an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore, the reporter shall be physically present in the same room as the judicial officer if the court cannot provide the technology standards described in subdivision (o).

(g) If the court conducts a trial, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology, upon request, the court interpreter shall be physically present in the courtroom.

(h) (1) If any of the following conditions are present and cannot be resolved, the court shall not permit any party, counsel, or witness to appear or participate in proceedings through the use of remote technology, and shall continue any proceeding being conducted with the use of remote technology:

(A) The court does not have the technology necessary to conduct the proceeding remotely.

(B) Although the court has the requisite technology, the quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding prevents the effective management or resolution of the proceeding.

(C) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare and certify a transcript of the proceeding.

(D) The court reporter is unable to capture the verbatim record and certify a transcript of any proceeding that is conducted remotely, in whole or in part, to the same extent and in the same manner as if it were not conducted remotely.

(E) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits the ability of the person to understand or participate in the proceeding.

(F) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits counsel from being able to provide effective representation to the person.

(G) The court does not have the technology necessary for secure, confidential communication between counsel and the person.

(H) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits a court interpreter’s ability to provide language access, including to communicate and interpret directly with the person and the court during the proceedings.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (e) or otherwise provided by law, the court may require a party or witness to appear in person at a proceeding if the court determines on a hearing-by-hearing basis that an inperson appearance would materially assist in the determination of the proceeding or resolution of the case. The court’s determination shall be based on the individual case before the court and shall be entered into the minutes or otherwise made on the record. In making its determination, the court shall
 consider the request of the person, the nature of the proceedings, and whether requiring the physical presence of the person would disrupt the person’s program of treatment or be detrimental to their mental or physical health.

(3) The court shall not continue proceedings beyond statutory time limits pursuant to this section absent a waiver by the person in consultation with counsel.

(i) Subject to the limitations in subdivision (h), this section is not intended to prohibit the use of appearances through the use of remote technology when stipulated by attorneys for represented parties.

(j) Before the court may conduct proceedings through the use of remote technology, the court shall have a process for a party, witness, official reporter, official reporter pro tempore, court interpreter, or other court personnel to
 alert the judicial officer of technology or audibility issues that arise during the proceedings.

(k) The court shall inform all parties, particularly parties without legal representation, about the potential technological or audibility issues that could arise when using remote technology, which may require a delay of or halt the proceedings. The court shall make information available to self-represented parties regarding the options for appearing in person and through the use of remote technology.

(l) A self-represented party may appear remotely in a proceeding conducted through the use of remote technology only if they agree to do so.

(m) For purposes of this section, a party includes a nonparty subject to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2020.010) of Title 4 of Part 4.

(n) Consistent with its constitutional rulemaking authority, the Judicial Council shall adopt such other rules and standards as are necessary to implement the policies and provisions of this section and the intent of the Legislature.

(o) By April 1, 2024, the Judicial Council shall adopt, and trial courts shall implement by July 1, 2024, minimum standards for the courtroom technology necessary to permit remote participation in proceedings subject to this section. Those standards shall include, but not be limited to, hard-wired or other reliable high-speed internet connections in the courtroom for the judicial officer and court reporter, and monitors, dedicated cameras, speakers, and microphones so the judicial officer, court reporter, and court interpreter can appropriately see and hear remote participants, as well as to ensure that remote participants can appropriately see and hear
 the judicial officer and other courtroom participants.

(p) Consistent with federal and California labor law, a trial court shall not retaliate or threaten to retaliate against an official reporter or an official reporter pro tempore who notifies the judicial officer that technology or audibility issues are impeding the creation of the verbatim record of a proceeding that includes participation through remote technology. This subdivision shall only apply to an official reporter and an official reporter pro tempore when they meet the definition of “trial court employee” under subdivision (l) of Section 71601 of the Government Code.

(q) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 29, Sec. 2.   (SB 174)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

367.8.

(a) Each superior court shall report to the Judicial Council on or before October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, and the Judicial Council shall report to the Legislature on or before December 31, 2023, and annually thereafter, to assess the impact of technology issues or problems affecting remote proceedings, as included under Sections 367.75 and 367.76 of this code, and Section 679.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and all purchases and leases of technology or equipment to facilitate remote conferences, hearings, or proceedings. The report by each superior court and the Judicial Council shall specify all of the following for each annual reporting period:

(1) The number of proceedings conducted with the use of remote technology.

(2) Any superior court in which technology issues or problems occurred.

(3) The superior courts in which remote technology was used.

(4) The types of trial court conferences, hearings, or proceedings in which remote technology was used.

(5) The cost of purchasing, leasing, or upgrading remote technology.

(6) The type of technology and equipment purchased or leased.

(7) Any other information necessary to evaluate the use of remote proceedings by the courts.

(b) Each superior court shall report to the Judicial Council on or before October 1, 2025, and annually
 thereafter, and the Judicial Council shall report to the Legislature on or before December 31, 2025, and annually thereafter, the information identified in subdivision (a) to assess the impact of technology issues or problems affecting criminal remote proceedings, as included under Sections 977, 977.3, and 1043.5 of the Penal Code.

(c) (1) By October 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the court executive officer of each superior court shall certify to the Judicial Council, in a form and manner determined by the Judicial Council, that each courtroom of the superior court in which the court is conducting a remote proceeding meets the minimum standards for courtroom technology required pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 367.76 of this code, subdivision (j) of Section 977 of the Penal Code, or subdivision (n) of Section 679.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) By December 31, 2025, and annually thereafter, the Judicial Council shall report the information identified in paragraph (1) to the Legislature.

(d) A report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 29, Sec. 3.   (SB 174)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

367.10.

Consistent with its constitutional rulemaking authority, the Judicial Council shall adopt rules that include standards for when a judicial officer, in limited situations and in the interest of justice, may preside over a remote court proceeding from a location other than a courtroom.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 34, Sec. 6.   (SB 133)   Effective June 30, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

368.

In the case of an assignment of a thing in action, the action by the assignee is without prejudice to any set-off, or other defense existing at the time of, or before, notice of the assignment; but this section does not apply to a negotiable promissory note or bill of exchange, transferred in good faith, and upon good consideration, before maturity.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

368.5.

An action or proceeding does not abate by the transfer of an interest in the action or proceeding or by any other transfer of an interest. The action or proceeding may be continued in the name of the original party, or the court may allow the person to whom the transfer is made to be substituted in the action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

369.

(a) The following persons may sue without joining as parties the persons for whose benefit the action is prosecuted:

(1) A personal representative, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 58 of the Probate Code.

(2) A trustee of an express trust.

(3) Except for a person upon whom a power of sale has been conferred pursuant to a deed of trust or
 mortgage, a person with whom, or in whose name, a contract is made for the benefit of another.

(4) Any other person expressly authorized by statute.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a trustee upon whom a power of sale has been conferred pursuant to a deed of trust or mortgage may sue to exercise the trustee’s powers and duties pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2920) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

369.5.

(a) A partnership or other unincorporated association, whether organized for profit or not, may sue and be sued in the name it has assumed or by which it is known.

(b) A member of the partnership or other unincorporated association may be joined as a party in an action against the unincorporated association. If service of process is made on the member as an individual, whether or not the member is also served as a person upon whom service is made on behalf of the
 unincorporated association, a judgment against the member based on the member’s personal liability may be obtained in the action, whether the liability is joint, joint and several, or several.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Married Person [370. - 371.]

370.

A married person may be sued without his or her spouse being joined as a party, and may sue without his or her spouse being joined as a party in all actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1241.)
-------------------------------------------

371.

If spouses are sued together, each may defend for his or her own right, but if one spouse neglects to defend, the other spouse may defend for that spouse’s right also.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 15.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Disability of Party [372. - 376.]

372.

(a) (1) When a minor, a person who lacks legal capacity to make decisions, or a person for whom a conservator has been appointed is a party, that person shall appear either by a guardian or conservator of the estate or by a guardian ad litem appointed by the court in which the action or proceeding is pending, or by a judge thereof, in each case.

(2) (A) A guardian ad
 litem may be appointed in any case when it is deemed by the court in which the action or proceeding is prosecuted, or by a judge thereof, expedient to appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the minor, person who lacks legal capacity to make decisions, or person for whom a conservator has been appointed, notwithstanding that the person may have a guardian or conservator of the estate and may have appeared by the guardian or conservator of the estate.

(B) If application is made for appointment of a guardian ad litem for a person described in paragraph (1), and that person has a guardian or conservator of the estate, the application may be granted only if all of the following occur:

(i) The applicant gives notice and a copy of the application to the guardian or conservator of the estate upon filing the application.

(ii) The application discloses the existence of a guardian or conservator of the estate.

(iii) The application sets forth the reasons why the guardian or conservator of the estate is inadequate to represent the interests of the proposed ward in the action.

(C) The guardian or conservator of the estate shall have five court days from receiving notice of the application to file any opposition to the application.

(3) The guardian or conservator of the estate or guardian ad litem so appearing for any minor, person who lacks legal capacity to make decisions, or person for whom a conservator has been appointed shall have power, with the approval of the court in which the action or proceeding is pending, to compromise the same, to agree to the order or judgment to be entered therein for or against the ward or conservatee, and to satisfy any judgment or order in favor of the ward or conservatee or release or discharge any claim of the ward or
 conservatee pursuant to that compromise. Money or other property to be paid or delivered pursuant to the order or judgment for the benefit of a minor, person lacking legal capacity to make decisions, or person for whom a conservator has been appointed shall be paid and delivered as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3600) of Part 8 of Division 4 of the Probate Code.

(4) Where reference is made in this chapter to “a person who lacks legal capacity to make decisions,” the reference shall be deemed to include all of the following:

(A) A person who lacks capacity to understand the nature or consequences of the action or proceeding.

(B) A person who lacks capacity to assist the person’s attorney in the preparation
 of the case.

(C) A person for whom a conservator may be appointed pursuant to Section 1801 of the Probate Code.

(5) Nothing in this section, or in any other provision of this code, the Civil Code, the Family Code, or the Probate Code is intended by the Legislature to prohibit a minor from exercising an intelligent and knowing waiver of the minor’s constitutional rights in a proceeding under the Juvenile Court Law (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a minor 12 years of age or older may appear in court without a guardian, counsel, or guardian ad litem, for the purpose of requesting or opposing a request
 for any of the following:

(A) An injunction or temporary restraining order or both to prohibit harassment pursuant to Section 527.6.

(B) An injunction or temporary restraining order or both against violence or a credible threat of violence in the workplace pursuant to Section 527.8.

(C) A protective order pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Family Code.

(D) A protective order pursuant to Sections 7710 and 7720 of the Family Code.

The court may, either upon motion or in its own discretion, and after considering reasonable objections by the minor to the appointment of specific individuals,
 appoint a guardian ad litem to assist the minor in obtaining or opposing the order, provided that the appointment of the guardian ad litem does not delay the issuance or denial of the order being sought. In making the determination concerning the appointment of a particular guardian ad litem, the court shall consider whether the minor and the guardian have divergent interests.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision only, upon the issuance of an order pursuant to paragraph (1), if the minor initially appeared in court seeking an order without a guardian or guardian ad litem, and if the minor is residing with a parent or guardian, the court shall send a copy of the order to at least one parent or guardian designated by the minor, unless, in the discretion of the court, notification of a parent or guardian would be contrary to the best interest
 of the minor. The court is not required to send the order to more than one parent or guardian.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a minor may appear in court without a guardian ad litem in the following proceedings if the minor is a parent of the child who is the subject of the proceedings:

(A) Family court proceedings pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 12 of the Family Code.

(B) Dependency proceedings pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) Guardianship proceedings for a minor child pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 4 of
 the Probate Code.

(D) Any other proceedings concerning child custody, visitation, or support.

(2) If the court finds that the minor parent is unable to understand the nature of the proceedings or to assist counsel in preparing the case, the court shall, upon its own motion or upon a motion by the minor parent or the minor parent’s counsel, appoint a guardian ad litem.

(d) Before a court appoints a guardian ad litem pursuant to this chapter, a proposed guardian ad litem shall disclose both of the
 following to the court and all parties to the action or proceeding:

(1) Any known actual or potential conflicts of interest that would or might arise from the appointment.

(2) Any familial or affiliate relationship the proposed guardian ad litem has with any of the parties.

(e) If a guardian ad litem becomes aware that a potential conflict of interest has become an actual conflict of interest or that a new potential or actual conflict of interest exists, the guardian ad litem shall promptly disclose the conflict of interest to the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 843, Sec. 1.   (SB 1279)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

372.5.

(a) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem under a pseudonym pursuant to the requirements of this section.

(b) A person who applies for appointment as a guardian ad litem under a pseudonym shall, at the same time that the application is filed, file an ex parte request for leave to appear under a pseudonym. The ex parte request shall allege facts and circumstances establishing the guardian ad litem’s overriding
 interest in preserving his or her anonymity.

(c) To permit an applicant for appointment as a guardian ad litem to appear under pseudonym, the court shall make each of the following findings:

(1) That the applicant has an overriding interest in preserving anonymity that supports permitting the applicant to appear under a pseudonym.

(2) That there is a substantial probability that the applicant’s interest in preserving anonymity will be prejudiced if the applicant is not permitted to appear under a pseudonym.

(3) That permitting the applicant to appear under a pseudonym is narrowly tailored to serve the applicant’s interest in preserving anonymity without unduly prejudicing the public’s right of access or the ability of the other parties to prosecute,
 defend, or resolve the action.

(4) That there are no less restrictive means of protecting the applicant’s interest in preserving his or her anonymity.

(d) (1) The court may make any further orders necessary to preserve the applicant’s anonymity or to allow the other parties or financial institutions to know the applicant’s identity to the extent necessary to prosecute, defend, or resolve the action.

(2) In addition to any other orders, the court may require a guardian ad litem who is permitted to appear under a pseudonym and is not represented by counsel to designate a mailing or electronic address for service of process and to consent to accept service of process under the pseudonym at that address for purposes of the action.

(e) (1) If a guardian ad litem is permitted to appear under a pseudonym, all court decisions, orders, petitions, and any documents filed with the court shall be written in a manner that protects the name and personal identifying information of the guardian ad litem from public disclosure, except to the extent the information is necessary for the parties to prosecute, defend, or resolve the action.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “personal identifying information” includes the guardian ad litem’s name or any part thereof, his or her address or any part thereof, and the city or unincorporated area of the guardian ad litem’s residence.

(f) The responsibility for excluding the name and personal identifying information of the guardian ad litem from documents filed with the court rests solely with the parties and their attorneys. This section
 does not require the court to review pleadings or other papers for compliance with this subdivision.

(g) After granting permission for a guardian ad litem to appear under a pseudonym pursuant to this section, the court shall retain discretion to reconsider its decision.

(h) This section does not affect the right of a plaintiff or petitioner to pursue litigation under a pseudonym in appropriate circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 817, Sec. 1.   (AB 2185)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

373.

When a guardian ad litem is appointed, he or she shall be appointed as follows:

(a) If the minor is the plaintiff the appointment must be made before the summons is issued, upon the application of the minor, if the minor is 14 years of age or older, or, if under that age, upon the application of a relative or friend of the minor.

(b) If the minor is the defendant, upon the application of the minor, if the minor is 14 years of age or older, and the minor applies within 10 days after the service of the summons, or, if under that age or if the minor neglects to apply, then upon the application of a relative or friend of the minor, or of any other party to the action, or by the court on its own motion.

(c) If the person lacking legal competence to make decisions is a party to an action or proceeding, upon the application of a relative or friend of the person lacking legal competence to make decisions, or of any other party to the action or proceeding, or by the court on its own motion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 6.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

373.5.

If under the terms of a written instrument, or otherwise, a person or persons of a designated class who are not ascertained or who are not in being, or a person or persons who are unknown, may be or may become legally or equitably interested in any property, real or personal, the court in which any action, petition or proceeding of any kind relative to or affecting the property is pending, may, upon the representation of any party thereto, or of any person interested, appoint a suitable person to appear and act therein as guardian ad litem of the person or persons not ascertained, not in being, or who are unknown; and the judgment, order or decree in the proceedings, made
 after the appointment, shall be conclusive upon all persons for whom the guardian ad litem was appointed.

The guardian ad litem shall have power, with the approval of the court in which the action, petition or proceeding is pending, to compromise the same, to agree to the order or judgment to be entered therein for or against the persons for whom the guardian ad litem was appointed, and to satisfy any judgment or order in favor of the persons, or release, or discharge any claim of the persons pursuant to the compromise. The court shall have the same power with respect to the money or other property to be paid or delivered under such order or judgment as is provided in Section 372 of this code.

The reasonable expenses of the guardian ad litem, including compensation and counsel fees, shall be determined by the court and paid as it may order, either out of the property or by plaintiff or petitioner. If the expenses are to be
 paid by the plaintiff or petitioner, execution therefor may issue in the name of the guardian ad litem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 435.)
-------------------------------------------

374.

(a) A minor under 12 years of age, accompanied by a duly appointed and acting guardian ad litem, shall be permitted to appear in court without counsel for the limited purpose of requesting or opposing a request for (1) an injunction or temporary restraining order or both to prohibit harassment pursuant to Section 527.6, (2) an injunction or temporary restraining order or both against violence or a credible threat of violence in the workplace pursuant to Section 527.8, (3) a protective order pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section
 6200) of the Family Code, or (4) a protective order pursuant to Sections 7710 and 7720 of the Family Code.

(b) In making the determination concerning appointment of a particular guardian ad litem for purposes of this section, the court shall consider whether the minor and the guardian have divergent interests.

(c) The Judicial Council shall adopt forms by July 1, 1999, to implement this section. The forms shall be designed to facilitate the appointment of the guardian ad litem for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 706, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

374.5.

A proceeding initiated by or brought against a minor for any of the injunctions or orders described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 372 or subdivision (a) of Section 374 shall be heard in the court assigned to hear those matters; except that, if the minor bringing the action or against whom the action is brought has previously been adjudged a dependent child or a ward of the juvenile court, the matter shall be heard in the juvenile court having jurisdiction over the minor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 706, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

375.

An action or proceeding does not abate by the disability of a party. The court, on motion, shall allow the action or proceeding to be continued by or against the party’s representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

376.

(a) The parents of a legitimate unmarried minor child, acting jointly, may maintain an action for injury to the child caused by the wrongful act or neglect of another. If either parent fails on demand to join as plaintiff in the action or is dead or cannot be found, then the other parent may maintain the action. The parent, if living, who does not join as plaintiff shall be joined as a defendant and, before trial or hearing of any question of fact, shall be served with summons either in the manner provided by law for the service of a